Indiana, session 2026, HB1016.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-8-24.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 24.8. Selection of Primary Care Provider
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a policy of accident and sickness
insurance that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June
30, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "insured" means an individual
entitled to coverage under a policy of accident and sickness
insurance.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "policy of accident and sickness
insurance" has the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-5-1. The term does
not include a policy, plan, or coverage set forth in IC 27-8-5-2.5(a).
Sec. 4. Subject to section 7 of this chapter, a policy of accident
and sickness insurance that requires an insured to select a primary
care provider to receive coverage may permit an insured to select
a participating provider who is:
2026 IN 1016—LS 6213/DI 141


(1) a physical therapist to provide physical therapy services;
or
(2) an occupational therapist to provide occupational therapy
services.
Sec. 5. A policy of accident and sickness insurance must clearly
state in literature explaining the policy the options available to an
insured under section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. A policy of accident and sickness insurance may not
impose a higher premium, a higher copayment requirement, or any
other additional expense on an insured because the insured selected
a primary care provider in accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 7. Nothing in this chapter permits:
(1) a physical therapist to practice physical therapy outside of
the physical therapist's scope of practice under IC 25-27; or
(2) an occupational therapist to practice occupational therapy
outside of the occupational therapist's scope of practice under
IC 25-23.5.
SECTION 2. IC 27-13-37-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) This section applies to an
individual contract and a group contract that is entered into,
delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
(b) Subject to subsection (e), a health maintenance organization
that requires an enrollee to select a primary care provider to
receive coverage may permit an enrollee to select a participating
provider who is:
(1) a physical therapist to provide physical therapy services;
or
(2) an occupational therapist to provide occupational therapy
services.
(c) An individual contract or a group contract must clearly state
in literature explaining the contract the options available to an
enrollee under subsection (b).
(d) A health maintenance organization may not impose a higher
premium, a higher copayment requirement, or any other
additional expense on an enrollee because the enrollee selected a
primary care provider in accordance with this section.
(e) Nothing in this section permits:
(1) a physical therapist to practice physical therapy outside of
the physical therapist's scope of practice under IC 25-27; or
(2) an occupational therapist to practice occupational therapy
outside of the occupational therapist's scope of practice under
2026 IN 1016—LS 6213/DI 141


IC 25-23.5.
2026 IN 1016—LS 6213/DI 141